Washington statutes.
RCW 43.84.140

Investment of scientific school, agricultural college, and state university funds in regents' revenue bonds.

The state investment board is authorized to invest moneys in the scientific school permanent fund and the agricultural college permanent fund in regents' revenue bonds issued by the board of regents of Washington State University for the purposes provided for in RCW 28B.10.300 and to invest moneys in the state university permanent fund in regents' revenue bonds issued by the board of regents of the University of Washington for the purposes provided in RCW 28B.10.300.

[ 1981 c 3 s 19; 1965 c 8 s 43.84.140. Prior: 1959 c 150 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—Severability—1981 c 3: See notes following RCW 43.33A.010.